Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,164
Act, how cited.

Sections 25-21,149 to 25-21,164 may be cited as the "Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act".

Laws 1929, c. 75, § 16, p. 259;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,155;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,164.